src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
taata:taka v2_ata_even ;
ringata:ringa v2_ata_even ;
jahata:jahta v2_ata_even ;
kohata:kohta v2_Hata_even ;
puohata:puoha v2_ata_even ;
friiata:friia v2_ata_even ;
luurentreijata:luurentreija v2_ata_even ;
jaakata:jaakka v2_ata_even ;
leekata:leek2a v2_ata_even ;
piikata:piikka v2_ata_even ;
nalkata:nalkka v2_ata_even ;
vinkata:vinkka v2_ata_even ;
muokata:muokka v2_ata_even ;
lieskata:lieska v2_ata_even ;
kerskata:kerska v2_ata_even ;
hukata:hukka v2_ata_even ;
kelata:kela v2_ata_even ;
pilata:pila v2_ata_even ;
kollata:kolla v2_ata_even ;
proslata:prosla v2_ata_even ;
anmäälata:anmääla v2_ata_odd ;
loimata:loima v2_ata_even ;
juumata:juuma v2_ata_even ;
liinata:liina v2_ata_even ;
masinata:masina v2_ata_odd ;
siunata:siuna v2_ata_even ;
kipata:kippa v2_ata_even ;
nopata:noppa v2_ata_even ;
tupata:tuppa v2_ata_even ;
analyseerata:analyseera v2_ata_odd ;
komyniseerata:komyniseera v2_ata_odd ;
organiseerata:organiseera v2_ata_odd ;
filosofeerata:filosofeera v2_ata_odd ;
linjeerata:linjeera v2_ata_odd ;
lakeerata:lakeera v2_ata_odd ;
maskeerata:maskeera v2_ata_odd ;
taleerata:taleera v2_ata_odd ;
tisleerata:tisleera v2_ata_odd ;
puleerata:puleera v2_ata_odd ;
patuleerata:patuleera v2_ata_even ;
planeerata:planeera v2_ata_odd ;
porneerata:porneera v2_ata_odd ;
takseerata:takseera v2_ata_odd ;
ukseerata:ukseera v2_ata_odd ;
pukseerata:pukseera v2_ata_odd ;
äkseerata:äkseera v2_ata_odd ;
laventeerata:laventeera v2_ata_even ;
funteerata:funteera v2_ata_odd ;
hunteerata:hunteera v2_ata_odd ;
värteerata:värteera v2_ata_odd ;
protesteerata:protesteera v2_ata_odd ;
prutesteerata:prutesteera v2_ata_odd ;
tisteerata:tisteera v2_ata_odd ;
justeerata:justeera v2_ata_odd ;
kuitteerata:kuitteera v2_ata_odd ;
hantteerata:hantteera v2_ata_odd ;
plantteerata:plantteera v2_ata_odd ;
montteerata:montteera v2_ata_odd ;
sortteerata:sortteera v2_ata_odd ;
kraveerata:kraveera v2_ata_odd ;
särveerata:särveera v2_ata_odd ;
tierata:tiera v2_ata_odd ;
ajerata:ajera v2_ata_odd ;
talerata:talera v2_ata_odd ;
poorata:poora v2_ata_even ;
skorrata:skorra v2_ata_even ;
jurata:jura v2_ata_even ;
traisata:traisa v2_ata_even ;
osata:osa v2_ata_even ;
vuossata:vuossa v2_ata_even ;
latata:latta v2_ata_even ;
meltata:meltta v2_ata_even ;
luntata:luntta v2_ata_even ;
mestata:mesta v2_ata_even ;
luutata:luutta v2_ata_even ;
kruuata:kruua v2_ata_even ;
havata:hava v2_havata ;
veivata:veiva v2_ata_even ;
arvata:arva v2_ata_even ;
luvata:luva v2_ata_even ;
paota:pako v2_uta ;
vengota:venko v2_uta ;
pahota:paho v2_uta ;
inhota:inho v2_uta ;
liota:lio v2_uta ;
varjota:varjo v2_uta ;
toikota:toikko v2_uta ;
karkota:karkko v2_uta ;
tukota:tukko v2_uta ;
piilota:piilo v2_uta ;
pulota:pulo v2_uta ;
homota:homo v2_uta ;
menota:meno v2_uta ;
innota:inno v2_uta ;
luoota:luoo v2_uta ;
upota:uppo v2_uta ;
loirota:loiro v2_uta ;
taurota:tauro v2_uta ;
loitota:loitto v2_uta ;
puota:puto v2_uta ;
kovota:kovo v2_uta ;
touhuta:touhu v2_uta ;
muijuta:muiju v2_uta ;
klinkuta:klinkku v2_uta ;
tuiskuta:tuisku v2_uta ;
kukuta:kukku v2_uta ;
valuta:valu v2_uta ;
joluta:jolu v2_uta ;
remuta:remu v2_uta ;
poimuta:poimu v2_uta ;
komuta:komu v2_uta ;
juhnuta:juhnu v2_uta ;
kniputa:knippu v2_uta ;
pumputa:pumppu v2_uta ;
luiruta:luiru v2_uta ;
mauruta:mauru v2_uta ;
kasuta:kasu v2_uta ;
fransuta:fransu v2_uta ;
pursuta:pursu v2_uta ;
sututa:suttu v2_uta ;
kivuta:kivu v2_uta ;
kirvuta:kirvu v2_uta ;
räivätä:räivä v2_ata_even ;
hävetä:häpe v2_uta ;
leikitä:leik2i v2_uta ; 
pimitä:pimi v2_uta ; 
vieritä:vieri v2_uta ; 
kevitä:kevi v2_uta ; 
hävitä:hävi v2_uta ;
krynkytä:krynkky v2_uta ;
tyllytä:tylly v2_uta ;
värytä:väry v2_uta ;
läjätä:läjä v2_ata_even ;
tryskätä:tryskä v2_ata_even ;
frääkätä:frääkkä v2_ata_even ;
kylmätä:kylmä v2_ata_even ;
ryypätä:ryyppä v2_ata_even ;
törrätä:törrä v2_ata_even ;
jääsätä:jääsä v2_ata_even ;
pormäntätä:pormänttä v2_ata_odd ;
mettätä:mett2ä v2_ata_even ;
köhötä:köhö v2_uta ;
märsätä:märsä v2_ata_even ;
raijata:raija v2_ata_odd ; 
utkata:utka v2_ata_odd ;
surmata:surma v2_ata_odd ;
revitaliseerata:revitaliseera v2_ata_odd ;
